Massachusetts, session 194th, H2265.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 17 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following new section:-
7B. The department shall establish, conduct and maintain an annual program of education
and training for all new members of local boards of health; provided, however, that the
department shall consult with the Massachusetts Municipal Association in the development of
said program; provided, further, that the department may contract with the Massachusetts
Association of Boards of Health to provide such education and training. All education and
training courses shall be free of charge to board members and shall be offered in various
locations throughout the commonwealth and by online only methods.
of 3

SECTION 2. Chapter 21A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section fifteen the following new section:-
15A. The department of environmental protection shall establish, conduct and maintain
an annual program of education and training for all new members of local conservation
commissions; provided, however, that the department shall consult with the Massachusetts
Municipal Association in the development of said program; provided, further, that the
department may contract with the Massachusetts Association of Conservation Commissions to
provide such education and training. All education and training courses shall be free of charge to
commission members and shall be offered in various locations throughout the commonwealth
and by online only methods.
SECTION 3. Section 3 of Chapter 23B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following new
subsection:-
(w) establish, conduct and maintain an annual program of education and training for all
new members of local planning boards and zoning boards of appeals; provided, however that the
department shall consult with the Massachusetts Municipal Association regarding in
development of said program; provided, further, the department may contract with the
Massachusetts Citizen Planning Training Collaborative at the University of Massachusetts to
provide such education and training. All education and training courses shall be free of charge to
board members and shall be offered in various locations throughout the commonwealth and by
online only methods.
of 3

SECTION 4. Section 8C of Chapter 40 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following new paragraph:-
The members of the commission shall complete such training programs conducted or
sponsored by the department of environmental protection under the provisions of Section 15A of
Chapter 21A prior to their service on the commission.
SECTION 5. Section 12 of Chapter 40A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following new paragraph:-
The members of the board shall complete such training programs conducted or sponsored
by the department of housing and community development under the provisions of Section 3 of
Chapter 23B prior to their service on the board.
SECTION 6. Section 81A of Chapter 41 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following new paragraph:-
The members of the board shall complete such training programs conducted or sponsored
by the department of housing and community development under the provisions of Section 3 of
Chapter 23B prior to their service on the board.
SECTION 7. Section 26 of Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the fifth sentence the following new
sentence:- The members of the board shall complete such training programs conducted or
sponsored by the department of public health under the provisions of Section 7B of Chapter 17
prior to their service on the board.
of 3